Utah statutes.
17-41-302.   Notice of proposal for creation of agriculture protection area
or industrial protection area -- Responses.
(1)  Each applicable legislative body shall provide notice of the proposal by:
(a) (i)  publishing notice:
(A)  in a newspaper having general circulation within:
(I)  the same county as the land proposed for inclusion within an agriculture
protection area or industrial protection area, as the case may be, if the land
is within the unincorporated part of the county; or
(II) the same city or town as the land proposed for inclusion within an
agriculture protection area or industrial protection area, as the case may be,
if the land is within a city or town; and
(ii)  as required in Section 45-1-101;
(b)  posting notice at five public places, designated by the county or
municipal legislative body, within or near the proposed agriculture protection
area or industrial protection area; and
(c)  mailing written notice to each owner of land within 1,000 feet of the
land proposed for inclusion within an agriculture protection area or
industrial protection area.
(2)  The notice shall contain:
(a)  a statement that a proposal for the creation of an agriculture protection
area or industrial protection area has been filed with the applicable
legislative body;
(b)  a statement that the proposal will be open to public inspection in the
office of the applicable legislative body;
(c)  a statement that any person or entity affected by the establishment of
the area may, within 15 days of the date of the notice, file with the
applicable legislative body:
(i)  written objections to the proposal; or
(ii)  a written request to modify the proposal to exclude land from or add
land to the proposed agriculture protection area or industrial protection
area, as the case may be;
(d)  a statement that the applicable legislative body will submit the proposal
to the advisory committee and to the planning commission for review and
recommendations;
(e)  a statement that the applicable legislative body will hold a public
hearing to discuss and hear public comment on:
(i)  the proposal to create the agriculture protection area or industrial
protection area;
(ii)  the recommendations of the advisory committee and planning commission;
and
(iii)  any requests for modification of the proposal and any objections to the
proposal; and
(f)  a statement indicating the date, time, and place of the public hearing.
(3) (a)  Any person wishing to modify the proposal for the creation of the
agriculture protection area or industrial protection area shall, within 15
days after the date of the notice, file a written request for modification of
the proposal, which identifies specifically the land that should be added to
or removed from the proposal.
(b)  Any person wishing to object to the proposal for the creation of the
agriculture protection area or industrial protection area shall, within 15
days after the date of the notice, file a written objection to the creation of
the agriculture protection area or industrial protection area.
